West Virginia, session 2025, HB2066.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 3. CRIMES AGAINST PROPERTY. §61-3-60. Damage, destruction, or theft  of equipment used by first responders; criminal penalties. (a) Any person who knowingly and willfully damages, destroys, or steals any equipment, or personal property, owned or operated by the state, county, municipality, or volunteer fire department of this state, that is used by first responders in the performance of their duties, whether that equipment or personal property is in use or maintained in a garage or other building, structure, or location, and that action thereby creates a substantial risk of bodily injury to another person, or results in property loss, or the interruption of service by first responders to the public, is guilty of a felony and, upon conviction thereof, shall be fined not more than $5,000, or imprisoned in a state correctional facility not less than one nor more than three years, or both fined and imprisoned.(b) For purposes of this section, the term "first responder" includes law-enforcement officers, firefighters, emergency medical services personnel, volunteer fire departments and others who respond to calls for emergency medical assistance as defined in §55-7-26.